Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8181.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-13.1-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-13.1 entitled "The
Rhode Island Bridge Replacement, Reconstruction, and Maintenance Fund" is hereby amended to
read as follows:
42-13.1-4. Authority to collect tolls on large commercial trucks only.
(a) The department is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the
privilege of traveling on Rhode Island bridges to provide for replacement, reconstruction,
maintenance, and operation of Rhode Island bridges. The tolls shall be fixed after conducting a
cost-benefit analysis and providing an opportunity for public comment. The tolls shall be collected
on large commercial trucks only and shall not be collected on any other vehicle; provided, however,
no vehicle shall be tolled other than a tractor or truck tractor as defined in 23 C.F.R. 658.5, pulling
a trailer or trailers. No act authorizing tolls on passenger vehicles pursuant to this chapter shall take
effect until it has been approved by the majority of those electors voting in a statewide referendum.
The secretary of state shall certify the results of the statewide referendum. Tolls on large
commercial trucks may be implemented utilizing all-electric toll collection methodologies on a
cash-less basis, or utilizing any other methodologies determined by the department.
(b) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the department will establish a program to limit the assessment
of the tolls upon the same individual large commercial truck using a RFID to once per toll facility,
per day in each direction, or an equivalent frequency use program based upon individual large

commercial truck use.
(c) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the total amount of tolls imposed upon the same individual
large commercial truck using a RFID for making a border-to-border through trip on Route 95
Connecticut to Route 95 Massachusetts, or the reverse, shall not exceed twenty dollars ($20.00).
(d) Subject to § 42-13.1-14, the daily maximum amount of the tolls collected upon the same
individual large commercial truck using a RFID shall not exceed forty dollars ($40.00).
(e) All large commercial trucks or accessory trailers, operating on a contract with any
municipality in the state, and engaged in the business of waste management as defined in § 23-19-
5, which is transporting solid waste to the central landfill facility, as defined in § 23-19-5, or
returning from said facility to any other location, shall be exempt from any tolls established by this
chapter except those tolls generated on the Pell Bridge in Newport. Said trucks shall be outfitted
with a device similar to an RFID, exempting said trucks.
(e)(f) Tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any commission, board,
bureau, agency, or official of the state or any municipality or other political subdivision of the state
except the department.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005684
========
LC005684 - Page 2 of 3